Yamls/V-oz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-23
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - оз: # negative verb 'does not' / 'ei' / 'не'
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ог
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Comp: огжык
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2: он
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Comp: онжык
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3: оз
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Comp: озжык
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [ог, огӧ]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Comp: [огжык, огӧжык]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [од, одӧ]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Comp: [оджык, одӧжык]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [оз, озӧ]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Comp: [озжык, озӧжык]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Sg1: ог
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Sg1+Comp: огжык 
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Sg2: он 
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Sg2+Comp: онжык
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Sg3: оз 
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Sg3+Comp: озжык
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Pl1: [ог, огӧ]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Comp: [огжык, огӧжык] 
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Pl2: [од, одӧ] 
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Comp: [оджык, одӧжык]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Pl3: [оз, озӧ] 
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Fut+Pl3+Comp: [озжык, озӧжык]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg1: эг
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg1+Comp: эгжык
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg2: эн
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Comp: энжык
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3: эз
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Comp: эзжык
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [эг, эгӧ]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Comp: [эгжык, эгӧжык]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [эд, эдӧ]
     оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Comp: [эджык, эдӧжык]
#
     абу+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Sg: абу
     абу+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Sg+Comp: абужык  
     абу+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Pl: [абу, абуӧсь]
     абу+V+Aux+Neg+Prs+Pl+Comp: [абужык, абужыкӧсь, абуӧсьжык]
     эм+V+Aux+Prs+Sg: эм
     эм+V+Aux+Prs+Sg+Comp: эмжык
     эм+V+Aux+Prs+Pl: эмӧсь
     эм+V+Aux+Prs+Pl+Comp: [эмжыкӧсь, эмӧсьжык]
